Utah statutes.
53A-1a-601.   Job enhancements for mathematics, science, technology, and special education training.

(1)  As used in this part, "special education teacher" includes occupational therapist.

(2)  The Public Education Job Enhancement Program is established to attract, train, and retain highly qualified:

(a)  secondary teachers with expertise in mathematics, physics, chemistry, physical science, learning technology, or information technology;

(b)  special education teachers; and

(c)  teachers in grades four through six with mathematics endorsements.

(3)  The program shall provide for the following:

(a)  application by a school district superintendent or the principal of a school on behalf of a qualified teacher;

(b)  an award of up to $20,000 or a scholarship to cover the tuition costs for a master's degree, an endorsement, or graduate education in the areas identified in Subsection (2) to be given to selected public school teachers on a competitive basis:

(i)  whose applications are approved under Subsection 53A-1a-602(4); and

(ii)  who teach in the state's public education system for four years in the areas identified in Subsection (2);

(c) (i)  as to the cash awards under Subsection (3)(b), payment of the award in two installments, with an initial payment of up to $10,000 at the beginning of the term and up to $10,000 at the conclusion of the term;

(ii)  repayment of a portion of the initial payment by the teacher if the teacher fails to complete two years of the four-year teaching term in the areas identified in Subsection (2) as provided by rule of the State Board of Education in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, unless waived for good cause by the Job Enhancement Committee created in Section 53A-1a-602; and

(iii)  nonpayment of the second installment if the teacher fails to complete the four-year teaching term; and

(d) (i)  as to the scholarships awarded under Subsection (3)(b), provision for the providing institution to certify adequate performance in obtaining the master's degree, endorsement, or graduate education in order for the teacher to maintain the scholarship; and

(ii)  repayment by the teacher of a prorated portion of the scholarship, if the teacher fails to complete the authorized classes or program or to teach in the state system of public education in the areas identified in Subsection (2) for four years after obtaining the master's degree, the endorsement, or graduate education.

(4)  An individual teaching in the public schools under a letter of authorization may participate in the cash award program if:

(a)  the individual has taught under the letter of authorization for at least one year in the areas referred to in Subsection (2); and

(b)  the application made under Subsection (3)(a) is based in large part upon the individual receiving a superior evaluation as a classroom teacher.

(5) (a)  The program may provide for the expenditure of up to $1,000,000 of available monies, if at least an equal amount of matching monies become available, to provide professional development training to superintendents, administrators, and principals in the effective use of technology in public schools.

(b)  An award granted under this Subsection (5) shall be made in accordance with criteria developed and adopted by the Job Enhancement Committee created in Section 53A-1a-602.

(c)  An amount up to $120,000 of the $1,000,000 authorized in Subsection (5)(a) may be expended, regardless of the matching monies being available.

